Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 17 Trial

12-17-1.
Trial in superior court only on indictment, information, or appeal — Venue.

No person shall be put on trial for any offense before the superior court except upon indictment found by a grand jury, or upon an information signed by the attorney general or one of the attorney general’s designated assistants, or upon appeal from the sentence of a district court, and, unless otherwise provided by law, the trial shall be held before the superior court in the county in which the offense may lawfully be alleged to have been committed or shall have been committed and not elsewhere, but this provision and all other general and special provisions fixing the venue of criminal actions shall be subject to the exception that proceedings by indictment, information, or on appeal for offenses alleged to have been committed or committed in the county of Bristol shall be had in the county of Providence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, §§ 1, 7; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1179, 1180; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, §§ 1, 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 31; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-2.
“Not guilty” plea inferred.

If any person on being arraigned for an offense shall stand mute or not answer directly, or shall peremptorily challenge a greater number of the persons summoned as jurors than he or she is by law entitled to challenge, the plea of “not guilty” shall be entered on the record, the supernumerary challenges shall be disregarded, and the trial shall proceed as if the prisoner had pleaded “not guilty” and as if he or she had not made the challenges.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 15; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-2

.

12-17-3.
Waiver of jury trial — Special findings and rulings.

In all criminal cases the accused may, if he or she shall so elect and with the leave of the court, waive a trial by jury, and in those cases the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and try the cause without a jury and render judgment and pass sentence. In cases so tried the court shall, upon request of the accused, make special finding upon any issue of fact and special ruling upon any question of law arising in the case.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 78; P.L. 1929, ch. 1335, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 71; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-3

.

12-17-4.
Repealed.

12-17-5.
Continuance of trial to conclusion after opening to jury.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

8-7-2

, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law previously enacted, whenever a criminal trial shall have been opened to a jury the trial shall continue to its conclusion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2335, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-5

.

12-17-6.
Control and disposition of property used as evidence.

All property, money, or estate taken or detained as evidence in any criminal cause shall be subject to the order of the court before which the indictment, information, or complaint shall be brought or pending, and shall, at the termination of the cause, be restored to the rightful owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 66; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 66; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 59; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-6

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-7.
Release of property held as evidence after escape of defendant.

If any defendant charged with the commission of any crime or offense after arrest upon indictment, information, or complaint found shall have escaped, the court before which the indictment, information, or complaint shall be pending may, after the lapse of a reasonable time, return and restore any property or estate held pursuant to §

12-7-16

to its owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 67; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 67; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-7

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-8.
Compulsory process for defense witnesses.

Compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in favor of any person indicted or charged by information shall issue out of any court before which the person shall be brought for trial, upon a satisfactory showing that he or she is unable to procure witnesses at his or her own expense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 65; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 65; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 68; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 68; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 61; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-8

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 23; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-9.
Defendant as witness.

No respondent in a criminal prosecution, offering himself or herself as a witness, shall be excluded from testifying because he or she is a respondent; and neglect or refusal so to testify shall create no presumption nor be used in argument against him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 396; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-9

.

12-17-10.
Defendant’s spouse as witness.

The husband or wife of any respondent in a criminal prosecution, offering himself or herself as a witness, shall not be excluded from testifying because he or she is the husband or wife of the respondent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 397; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-10

.

12-17-10.1.
Spouse as witness in domestic or child abuse actions.

In any prosecution involving sexual assault, assault, or abuse committed against one’s spouse or against a minor child of the defendant or of the defendant’s spouse, the judge may order the spouse of the defendant to give testimony against the defendant notwithstanding the fact that the spouse may have been married to the defendant before, at the time of, or after the commission of the offense, and notwithstanding the fact that the spouse may be called as a witness during the existence of the marriage or after its dissolution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 124, § 2.

12-17-11.
Commitment of witness on presumption of perjury.

Whenever it shall appear to any court of record that any witness or party who has been legally sworn or affirmed and examined or has made an affidavit in the proceeding before the court has testified in such a manner as to induce a reasonable presumption that he or she has been guilty of perjury in the proceeding, the court may immediately commit the witness or party by an order or process for that purpose, or may take a recognizance with surety for his or her appearance to answer an indictment or information for perjury.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 72; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 72; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-11

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-12.
Detention of evidence as to perjury.

If, in any proceeding in which perjury may be reasonably presumed pursuant to §

12-17-11

, any papers, books, or documents shall have been produced which shall be deemed necessary to be used in any prosecution for perjury, the court may by order detain them from the person producing them, so long as may be necessary, in order that they may be used in the prosecution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 73; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 73; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 66; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-12

.

12-17-13.
Jury ordered not to separate.

Upon motion of the attorney general or of the attorney for the defendant in a criminal case, the court may, in its discretion, order that the jury impaneled and sworn to serve shall not be permitted to separate until discharged according to law from the further consideration of the case; provided, notwithstanding the provisions of §

8-7-2

, whenever a criminal trial shall have been opened to a jury, the trial shall continue to its conclusion; and provided, further, that the jurors shall receive double pay. Sheriffs assigned to juries subject to an order not to separate shall receive double pay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 34; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2333, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-13

.

12-17-14.
Conviction of lesser-included offense or attempt.

Whenever any person is tried upon an indictment, information, or complaint and the court or jury, as the case may be, shall not be satisfied that he or she is guilty of the whole offense, but shall be satisfied that he or she is guilty of so much of the offense as shall substantially amount to an offense of a lower nature, or that the defendant did not complete the offense charged, but that he or she was guilty only of an attempt to commit the same offense, the court or jury may find him or her guilty of the lower offense or guilty of an attempt to commit the offense, as the case may be, and the court shall proceed to sentence the person for the offense of which he or she shall be so found guilty, notwithstanding that the court had not otherwise jurisdiction of the offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 24; P.L. 1897, ch. 463, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1185; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 11; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

12-17-14

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 13.

12-17-15.
Compelling evidence in criminal proceedings — Immunity.

Whenever a witness, including a child as defined in §

14-1-3

, refuses, on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination, to answer a question or to produce other evidence of any kind in a criminal proceeding before any court or grand jury of this state, the attorney general may, in writing, request the presiding justice of the superior court or the chief judge of the family court or the district court to order the witness to answer the question or produce the evidence. The court, in its discretion, after notice to the witness, may order the witness to answer the question or produce the evidence. The witness may not refuse to comply with the order on the basis of his privilege against self-incrimination; but the witness shall not be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for, or on account of, any transaction or matter regarding which, in accordance with the order, he or she gave answer or produced evidence and no testimony or other information compelled under the order or any information directly or indirectly derived from the testimony or other information shall be used against the witness in any criminal case, except he or she may be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering or failing to answer, or in producing or failing to produce evidence, in accordance with the order. No court order directing a witness to answer a question or to produce evidence issued pursuant to this section shall operate to vacate, modify, or otherwise prevent the enforcement of any conviction, judgment, or sentence entered by any court against the witness prior to the grant of immunity, unless the order entered pursuant to this section expressly provides for it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 513, § 1.

12-17-16.
Defendant’s right of discovery.

In any criminal proceeding where the prosecution is in possession of tangible evidence which may be used at trial of any defendant, the defendant shall have the right upon demand given in writing to the prosecuting authorities to inspect, examine, and/or copy the evidence at a time and place to be fixed by a justice of a court of proper jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 203, § 1.

12-17-17.
Restrictions on the defense of provocation.

For purposes of determining sudden quarrel or heat of passion, the provocation was not objectively reasonable if it resulted solely from the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim’s actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted, non-forcible romantic or sexual advance toward the defendant, or if the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic relationship.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 294, § 1.

12-17-18.
Restrictions on the defense of diminished capacity.

A defendant does not suffer from reduced mental capacity based solely on the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim’s actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted, non-forcible romantic or sexual advance toward the defendant, or if the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 294, § 1.

12-17-19.
Restrictions on the defense of self-defense.

A person is not justified in using force against another based solely on the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim’s actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted, non-forcible romantic or sexual advance toward the defendant, or if the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 294, § 1.